Hawaii statutes.
[§667-36] Sale of property separately. If
the mortgaged property consists of more than one real property, each property
may be sold separately to satisfy the mortgage debt. [L 1998, c 122, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next